zh-CN: 尺码系统: AU/NZ; CN; EU; 国际标准（字母）; JP; UK; US; 其他
ko: 사이즈 체계: AU/NZ; CN; EU; 국제(문자); JP; UK; US; 기타
pt-BR: Sistema de tamanho: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internacional (letra); JP; UK; EUA; Outro
ja: サイズシステム: AU/NZ; CN; EU; インターナショナル (文字); JP; UK; US; その他
tr: Beden sistemi: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Uluslararası (harf); JP; UK; US; Diğer
da: Størrelsessystem: AU/NZ; CN; EU; International (bogstav); JP; UK; US; Andet
sk-SK: Systém veľkosti: AU/NZ; CN; EÚ; Medzinárodné (písmenové); JP; UK; US; Iné
nl: Maatsysteem: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internationaal (letter); JP; UK; US; Overig
lt-LT: Dydžių sistema: AU / NZ; CN; ES; Tarptautinis (raidėmis); JP; JK; JAV; Kita
bg-BG: Система за размери: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Международна (с букви); JP; UK; US; Друга
fr: Système de tailles: AU/NZ; CN; EU; International (lettres); JP; UK; US; Autre
de: Größensystem: AU/NZ; CN; EU; International (Buchstabe); JP; UK; US; Andere
pl: System opisu rozmiaru: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Międzynarodowy (literowy); JP; UK; US; Inne
hu: Méretezési rendszer: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Nemzetközi (betűs); JP; UK; US; Egyéb
cs: Systém velikostí: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Mezinárodní (písmena); JP; UK; US; Jiný
nb: Størrelsessystem: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internasjonal (bokstav); JP; UK; US; Annet
es: Sistema de tallas: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internacional (letras); JP; UK; US; Otro
fi: Kokojärjestelmä: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Kansainvälinen (kirjain); JP; UK; US; Muu
vi: Hệ thống kích thước: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Quốc tế (chữ cái); JP; UK; US; Khác
sv: Storlekssystem: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internationell (bokstav); JP; UK; US; Övrigt
el: Σύστημα μεγεθών: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Διεθνές (γράμμα); JP; UK; US; Άλλο
pt-PT: Sistema de tamanhos: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internacional (letra); JP; UK; US; Outro
zh-TW: 尺寸系統: AU/NZ; CN; EU; 國際 (字母); JP; UK; US; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem velikosti: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Mednarodno (črke); JP; UK; ZDA; Drugo
ru: Система размеров: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Международный (буквенный); JP; UK; US; Другое
th: ระบบขนาด: AU/NZ; CN; EU; สากล (ตัวอักษร); JP; UK; US; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Sistem de mărimi: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internațional (literă); JP; UK; US; Altul
en: Size system: AU/NZ; CN; EU; International (letter); JP; UK; US; Other
it: sistema di ventilazione: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Internazionale (lettera); JP; UK; US; Altro
hr-HR: Sustav veličina: AU/NZ; CN; EU; Međunarodni (slova); JP; UK; US; Ostalo